Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
PART 3
OFFENDERS SENTENCED FOR CRIMES
COMMITTED ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 1979

17-22.5-301. Good time.

Each person sentenced for a crime committed on or after July 1, 1979, but before July 1, 1981, whose conduct indicates that he has substantially observed all of the rules and regulations of the institution or facility in which he has been confined and has faithfully performed the duties assigned to him shall be entitled to a good time deduction of fifteen days a month from his sentence. The good time authorized by this section shall vest quarterly and may not be withdrawn once it has vested. No more than forty-five days of good time may be withheld by the department in any three-month period of sentence.

Each person sentenced for a crime committed on or after July 1, 1981, but before July 1, 1985, shall be subject to all the provisions of this part 3; except that the good time authorized by this section shall vest semiannually and no more than ninety days of good time may be withheld by the department in any six-month period of sentence.

Each person sentenced for a crime committed on or after July 1, 1985, shall be subject to all the provisions of this part 3; except that the good time authorized by this section shall not vest and may be withheld or deducted by the department.

Nothing in this section shall be so construed as to prevent the department from withholding good time earnable in subsequent periods of sentence, but not yet earned, for conduct occurring in a given period of sentence.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 520, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(3) amended, p. 646, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 98:

(3) amended, p. 727, § 10, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 17-22.5-101 as it existed prior to 1984.

17-22.5-302. Earned time.

In addition to the good time authorized in section 17-22.5-301, earned time, not to exceed thirty days for every six months of incarceration, may be deducted from the inmate's sentence upon a demonstration to the department by the inmate that he has made substantial and consistent progress in each of the following categories:

Work and training, including attendance, promptness, performance, cooperation, care of materials, and safety;

Group living, including housekeeping, personal hygiene, cooperation, social adjustment, and double bunking;

Participation in counseling sessions and involvement in self-help groups;

Progress toward the goals and programs established by the Colorado diagnostic program.

(1.3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section to the contrary, after his or her first ninety days in administrative segregation, a state inmate in administrative segregation shall be eligible to receive earned time if he or she meets the criteria required by this section or any modified criteria developed by the department to allow a state inmate to receive the maximum amount of earned time allowable for good behavior and participation in any programs available to the state inmate in administrative segregation.

(1.5) (a) In addition to the thirty days of earned time authorized in subsection (1) of this section, an inmate who makes positive progress, in accordance with performance standards, goals, and objectives established by the department, in the correctional education program established pursuant to section 17-32-105, shall receive earned time pursuant to section 17-22.5-405; except that, if, upon review of the inmate's performance record, the inmate has failed to satisfactorily perform in the correctional education program, any earned time received pursuant to this paragraph (a) may be withdrawn as provided in subsection (4) of this section. For purposes of this paragraph (a), "positive progress", at a minimum, means that the person is attentive, responsive, and cooperative during the course of instruction and satisfactorily completes required work assignments equivalent to the courses and hours necessary for advancement at a rate of one grade level per calendar year in the school district where such inmate was last enrolled.

Repealed.

The department shall develop objective standards for measuring substantial and consistent progress in the categories listed in subsection (1) of this section. Such standards shall be applied in all evaluations of inmates for the earned time authorized in this section.

For each inmate sentenced for a crime committed on or after July 1, 1979, but before July 1, 1985, the department shall review the performance record of the inmate and shall grant, consistent with the provisions of this section, an earned time deduction from the sentence imposed. Such review shall be conducted at least annually; except that, in the case of an inmate who has one year or less of his sentence remaining to be served, the review shall be conducted at least semiannually. The earned time deduction authorized by this section shall vest upon being granted and may not be withdrawn once it is granted.

For each inmate sentenced for a crime committed on or after July 1, 1985, the department shall review the performance record of the inmate and may grant, withhold, withdraw, or restore, consistent with the provisions of this section, an earned time deduction from the sentence imposed. Such review shall be conducted as specified in subsection (3) of this section; except that the earned time deduction authorized by this subsection (4) shall not vest upon being granted and may be withdrawn once it is granted.

For each inmate sentenced for a crime committed on or after July 1, 1987, the department shall not credit such inmate with more than one-half of his allowable earned time for any six-month period or portion thereof unless such inmate was employed or was participating in institutional training or treatment programs provided by the department or was participating in some combination of such employment, training, or treatment programs. This subsection (5) shall not apply to those inmates excused from such employment or programs for medical reasons.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 521, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(5) added, p. 654, § 10, effective March 27.

L. 88:

(1.5) added, p. 697, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1.5)(a) amended and (1.5)(b) repealed, pp. 976, 977, §§ 3, 7, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1.5)(a) amended, p. 431, § 9, effective May 24.

L. 92:

(1.5)(a) amended, p. 2173, § 23, effective June 2.

L. 2011:

(1.3) added, (SB 11-176), ch. 289, p. 1343, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(1.5)(a) amended, (HB 20-1402), ch. 216, p. 1047, § 29, effective June 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 17-22.5-102 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the Colorado diagnostic program, see article 40 of this title 17.

17-22.5-303. Parole.

As to any person sentenced for a class 2, class 3, class 4, or class 5 felony committed on or after July 1, 1979, but before July 1, 1981, the division of adult parole shall provide a one-year period of parole supervision and assistance in securing employment, housing, and such other services as may effect the successful reintegration of such offender into the community while recognizing the need for public safety; except that the state board of parole may discharge an offender at any time during the year upon a determination that the offender has been sufficiently rehabilitated and reintegrated into society and can no longer benefit from parole supervision. The conditions of parole for any such person shall be established by the state board of parole prior to his release from incarceration. Upon a determination that the conditions of parole have been violated in any parole revocation proceeding, the state board of parole shall continue the parole in effect, modify the conditions of parole if circumstances then shown to exist require such modifications, or revoke the parole and order the return of the offender to the institution in which he was originally received for a period of not more than six months. For second and subsequent revocations of parole, the offender shall be reincarcerated; but in no event shall any such person spend more than one year under parole supervision and reincarceration as provided in this section. The good time deduction authorized by section 17-22.5-301 shall apply to periods of reincarceration provided for in this section.

As to any person sentenced for a class 2, class 3, class 4, or class 5 felony committed on or after July 1, 1981, and before July 1, 1984, the division of adult parole shall provide a one-year period of parole supervision and assistance in securing employment, housing, and such other services as may effect the successful reintegration of such offender into the community while recognizing the need for public safety; except that the state board of parole may discharge an offender at any time during the year upon a determination that the offender has been sufficiently rehabilitated and reintegrated into society and can no longer benefit from parole supervision. The conditions of parole for any such person shall be subject to section 17-2-201 (5)(b) and (5)(c) prior to his or her release from incarceration; but in no event shall any such person whose initial parole has not been revoked spend more than one year under parole supervision, as provided in this section. Upon a determination that the conditions of parole have been violated in any such parole revocation proceeding, the state board of parole shall continue the parole in effect, modify the conditions of parole if circumstances then shown to exist require such modifications, or revoke the parole and order the return of the offender to the institution in which he or she was originally received for a period of not more than two years; but in no event shall any period of reincarceration, subsequent term of parole, and sentence actually served exceed the sentence imposed pursuant to section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S. The good time deduction authorized by section 17-22.5-301 shall apply to periods of reincarceration provided for in this section.

The state board of parole, working in conjunction with the department, shall adopt risk assessment guidelines, based upon risk of violence to the general population, to be utilized for determining whether any person sentenced pursuant to the provisions of section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S., for committing a class 2, class 3, class 4, or class 5 felony committed on or after July 1, 1984, but before July 1, 1985, may be suitable for release on his or her parole eligibility date or shall be subject to extended parole of up to three years. Such guidelines shall include provisions which take into consideration the progress toward rehabilitation made by the individual as well as the necessity of guarding the welfare of the community.

As to any person sentenced for a class 2, class 3, class 4, or class 5 felony committed on or after July 1, 1984, but before July 1, 1985, the division of adult parole shall either release an offender on his or her parole eligibility date, pursuant to the determination made by the state board of parole, or shall provide up to three years of parole for any offender who is determined by the state board of parole to present a high risk to the general population upon release from incarceration. For persons who are provided parole, the division of adult parole shall provide a period of up to three years of parole supervision and assistance in securing employment, housing, and such other services as may effect the successful reintegration of such offender into the community while recognizing the need for public safety. The conditions for parole for any such offender under this subsection (4) shall be established pursuant to section 17-2-201 (5)(b) and (5)(c) by the state board of parole prior to his or her release from incarceration. Upon a determination that the conditions of parole have been violated in a parole revocation proceeding, the state board of parole shall continue the parole in effect, modify the conditions of parole if circumstances then shown to exist require such modifications, or revoke the parole and order the return of the offender to the institution in which he or she was originally received for a period of not more than five years. In no event shall any period of reincarceration, subsequent term of parole, and sentence actually served exceed the sentence imposed pursuant to section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S. The state board of parole may discharge an offender granted parole under this section at any time during the term of parole upon a determination that the offender has been sufficiently rehabilitated and reintegrated into society and can no longer benefit from parole supervision. The good time deduction authorized by section 17-22.5-301 shall apply to periods of reincarceration provided for in this section.

Pursuant to section 17-2-201 (9)(a), an interview of an inmate who applies for parole, who was sentenced for an offense committed on or after July 1, 1979, may be conducted by one member of the parole board.

Any person sentenced for a class 2, class 3, class 4, class 5, or class 6 felony committed on or after July 1, 1985, shall be eligible for parole after such person has served the sentence imposed less any time authorized for good time earned pursuant to section 17-22.5-301 and for earned time pursuant to section 17-22.5-302. Upon an application for parole, the state board of parole, working in conjunction with the department and using the guidelines established pursuant to section 17-22.5-404, shall determine whether or not to grant parole and, if granted, the length of the period of parole, which may be for a period of up to five years. If an application for parole is refused by the state board of parole, the state board shall reconsider within one year thereafter the granting of parole to such person and shall continue the reconsideration each year thereafter until such person is granted parole or until such person is discharged pursuant to law; except that, if the person applying for parole was convicted of any class 3 sexual offense described in part 4 of article 3 of title 18, C.R.S., a habitual criminal offense as defined in section 18-1.3-801 (2.5), C.R.S., or of any offense subject to the requirements of section 18-1.3-904, C.R.S., the board need only reconsider granting parole to such person once every three years, until the board grants such person parole or until such person is discharged pursuant to law, or if the person applying for parole was convicted of a class 1 or class 2 felony that constitutes a crime of violence, as defined in section 18-1.3-406, C.R.S., the board need only reconsider granting parole to such person once every five years, until the board grants such person parole or until such person is discharged pursuant to law.

For persons who are granted parole pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, the division of adult parole shall provide a period of up to five years of parole supervision and assistance in securing employment, housing, and such other services as may effect the successful reintegration of such offender into the community while recognizing the need for public safety. The conditions for parole for any such offender under this subsection (7) shall be established pursuant to section 17-22.5-404 by the state board of parole prior to such offender's release from incarceration. Upon a determination that the conditions of parole have been violated in a parole revocation proceeding, the state board of parole shall continue the parole in effect, modify the conditions of parole if circumstances then shown to exist require such modifications, which circumstances shall be set forth in writing, or revoke the parole and order the return of the offender to a place of confinement designated by the executive director for a period of not more than five years. In computing the period of reincarceration for an offender other than an offender sentenced for a nonviolent felony offense, as defined in section 17-22.5-405 (5), the time between the offender's release on parole and return to custody in Colorado for revocation of such parole shall not be considered to be any part of the term of the sentence. In no event shall any period of reincarceration and sentence actually served exceed the sentence imposed pursuant to section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S. The state board of parole may discharge an offender granted parole under this section at any time during the term of parole upon a determination that the offender has been sufficiently rehabilitated and reintegrated into society and can no longer benefit from parole supervision.

The state board of parole shall consider the parole of a person whose parole is revoked either for a technical violation or based on a self-revocation at least once within one hundred eighty days after the revocation if the person's release date is more than nine months from the date of the person's revocation; except that a person whose parole is revoked based on a technical violation that involved the use of a weapon shall not be considered for parole for one year.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 521, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(3) and (4) amended and (6) and (7) added, p. 648, § 4, effective July 1; (5) added, p. 641, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(7) amended, p. 654, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(6) amended, p. 924, § 6, effective March 27.

L. 92:

(6) and (7) amended, p. 2173, § 24, effective June 2.

L. 94:

(6) amended, p. 2597, § 6, effective June 3.

L. 95:

(7) amended, p. 877, § 12, effective May 24.

L. 2000:

(1), (2), (4), and (7) amended, p. 853, § 62, effective May 24.

L. 2002:

(2), (3), (4), (6), and (7) amended, p. 1502, § 163, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(6) amended, p. 812, § 1, effective July 1; (8) added, p. 2676, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(7) amended, p. 1756, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 17-22.5-103 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

(1) For parole revocation proceedings, see §§ 17-2-103 and 17-2-201; for the right to attend parole hearings, see § 17-2-214.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsections (2), (3), (4), (6), and (7), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

17-22.5-303.3. Violent offenders - parole.

Any person sentenced for second degree murder, first degree assault, first degree kidnapping, unless the first degree kidnapping is a class 1 felony, first or second degree sexual assault, first degree arson, first degree burglary, or aggravated robbery, committed on or after July 1, 1987, who has previously been convicted of a crime of violence, shall be eligible for parole after he has served seventy-five percent of the sentence imposed less any time authorized for earned time pursuant to section 17-22.5-302. Thereafter, the provisions of section 17-22.5-303 (6) and (7) shall apply.

Any person sentenced for any crime enumerated in subsection (1) of this section, who has twice previously been convicted for a crime of violence, shall be eligible for parole after he has served the sentence imposed less any time authorized for earned time pursuant to section 17-22.5-302. Thereafter, the provisions of section 17-22.5-303 (6) and (7) shall apply.

The governor may grant parole to an offender to whom this section applies before such offender's parole eligibility date if, in the governor's opinion, extraordinary mitigating circumstances exist and such offender's release from institutional custody is compatible with the safety and welfare of society.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 655, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(1) amended, p. 1435, § 28, effective June 11.

17-22.5-303.5. Parole guidelines. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 650, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended and (5) to (7) added, p. 655, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(2)(a)(IX) amended and (2)(a)(XI) added, p. 697, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1) amended, p. 925, § 7, effective March 27; (2)(a)(XII) added, p. 977, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section repealed, p. 335, § 2, effective May 18.

17-22.5-304. Part affects only certain inmates.

The good time provisions of this part 3 are effective July 1, 1979, and shall apply only to those persons convicted of crimes committed on or after said date. No person subject to the good time provisions of part 2 of this article shall be eligible for any of the provisions authorized by this part 3.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 523, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 652, § 6, effective July 1; Entire section amended, p. 1372, § 51, effective July 1.

17-22.5-305. Eligibility for other statutory provisions.

No person subject to the provisions of section 17-22.5-301 (1) shall be eligible for any of the time limit and vesting provisions of section 17-22.5-301 (2) or (3) or 17-22.5-302 (4).

No person subject to the provisions of section 17-22.5-301 (2) shall be eligible for any of the time limit and vesting provisions of section 17-22.5-301 (1) or (3) or 17-22.5-302 (4).

No person subject to the provisions of section 17-22.5-301 (3) shall be eligible for any of the time limit and vesting provisions of section 17-22.5-301 (1) or (2) or 17-22.5-302 (3).

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 523, § 1, effective July 1.

17-22.5-306. Transfer of functions.

The executive director shall, on and after July 1, 1984, execute, administer, perform, and enforce the rights, powers, duties, functions, and obligations formerly vested in the state board of parole with respect to the earned time provisions of section 17-22.5-302. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the state board of parole shall carry out all of its other functions as if this section had not been enacted.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 523, § 1, effective July 1.

17-22.5-307. Consecutive or concurrent sentences - clarification of mittimus.

If the department receives custody of a defendant who is sentenced to serve two or more terms of incarceration in the custody of the department, and any mittimus concerning the defendant's sentence or sentences does not clearly indicate whether the defendant's sentences are to be served consecutively or concurrently, then the department shall seek clarification in writing from the court regarding the defendant's sentence or sentences. The department shall seek such clarification not more than two business days after the department's receipt of the mittimus.

A court that receives a written request from the department pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall respond to the department and clarify the mittimus in question in order to accurately reflect the sentence previously entered in open court. The court shall provide such clarification in writing not more than two business days after receiving the request. The court shall provide a copy of the court's response to the counsel of record for the prosecution and the defense.

Until the department obtains clarification of the mittimus from the court, the department shall not make any determination of the defendant's parole eligibility date or mandatory release date.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1323), ch. 325, p. 1816, § 1, effective May 28.